Utah statutes.
32B-8a-502.   Effect of transfer in violation of this chapter.

(1)  If a retail license is transferred in violation of this chapter, the commission may:

(a)  void the transfer; and

(b)  require the retail license to be forfeited.

(2)  Subsection (1) is in addition to any other penalty under this title that is applicable to the person who violates this chapter.

